Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 11. Unfair Practices of Electricity Distributors.

§ 77-5-501.
Competition with proposed system barred for six months after filing of maps and statement of proposed operation.

Whenever a corporation or association organized under the provisions of Article 5 of this chapter (hereafter referred to in this article as the “filing corporation”) or whenever a group of persons which has formed a temporary organization with the intention of forming such a corporation or association under said laws, shall file with the Mississippi Rural Electrification Authority (hereafter referred to in this article as the “authority”) a map or maps indicating the area or areas in which the operations of said filing corporation are intended to be conducted, together with a statement verified by oath or affirmation to the effect that a majority of the potential users of electric energy, not then receiving central station electric service in said area or areas, has signified in writing its willingness to take service from the proposed system of said filing corporation it shall be unlawful for an electric utility, power and light company, person or corporation, after receipt of any notice provided in this article of the filing of said map or maps and statement, to begin the construction of any electric distribution lines within said area or areas or to solicit customers for electric service therein or in any manner to conflict, interfere or compete with the proposed system of said filing corporation, until after the expiration of six (6) months from the date of said filing of said map or maps and statement.

The words “area” or “areas” as used herein in connection with the maps to be filed by said filing corporation shall be deemed to mean the area or areas which may be served in normal practice by secondary voltage extensions from the primary voltage lines indicated in said maps, which in any event shall not be less than fifteen hundred (1500) feet from either side of said primary lines.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 5490, 5491; Laws, 1938, ch. 250; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.

§ 77-5-503.
Competition with proposed system barred for twelve months after filing of notice of federal loan agreement.

In the event that the filing corporation within the six months period provided for in Section 77-5-501 shall enter into any loan agreement with any federal agency for the financing of its proposed electric system, and shall file a written notice thereof with the authority, together with a copy of said loan agreement, no such electric utility, power and light company, person or corporation after receipt of notice of such loan agreement shall begin the construction of any electric distribution lines within said area or areas or solicit customers for electric service therein until after the expiration of twelve (12) months from the date of filing said notice of said loan agreement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5492; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.

§ 77-5-505.
Notice to be furnished private utilities.

It shall be the duty of the authority to give notice in writing of the filing of the map or maps and statement and the loan agreement provided for in Sections 77-5-501 and 77-5-503 to each electric utility and power and light company having any electric transmission or distribution lines or system within or within ten (10) miles of any area shown in said maps where said filing corporation intends to operate its proposed system. There shall be attached to said notice blueprint copies of said maps, a copy of said statement, and a copy of the notice of said loan agreement in the event that such an agreement shall have been entered into. Sufficient copies for the purpose of such notices shall be furnished to the authority by and at the expense of the filing corporation. The filing corporation may give the notices required by said sections and such notices shall be effectual for the purposes of this article, notwithstanding any failure of the authority to give the notices herein provided for. Any notice shall be deemed to have been given within the requirements of this article when it has been deposited in the mails with postage prepaid and addressed to the principal office of any such electric utility, power and light company, person or corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5493; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.

§ 77-5-507.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by authority; enforcement powers of authority.

The authority is hereby authorized to make and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this article and to take appropriate action for the enforcement thereof, including proceedings for injunctions against violations thereof, instigated in the name of the authority and upon its own motion. These powers and remedies shall be in addition to all other remedies provided in this article or that may exist under general provisions or rules of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5494; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.

§ 77-5-509.
Injunctions; chancery court powers.

Any filing corporation may institute proceedings to enjoin any violations of this article in the chancery court of any county where said filing corporation may have its principal place of business or where any such violations are alleged to take place or to be threatened, and such proceedings may be on the relation of the attorney-general or any district or county attorney of any district in which any portion of the proposed electric system of said filing corporation may be located. It shall be the duty of said officers to prosecute and to assist in the prosecution of said proceedings.

For the enforcement of this article, the said chancery court or the chancellor, in vacation, may exercise all the powers now or hereafter existing under the laws of this state in proceedings for injunctive relief, including temporary restraining orders. In any proceedings instituted by the authority on its own motion or by petition signed by the attorney-general or any district or county attorney, as herein provided, no bond shall be required as a condition of the issuance of any restraining order or injunction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5495; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.

§ 77-5-511.
Certified copy of statement of willingness to take service from proposed system as prima facie evidence.

In any proceeding for the enforcement of this article, a certified copy of the statement mentioned in Section 77-5-501 shall be admitted in evidence and shall be presumed to be prima facie proof of the verity and accuracy of all statements therein required by the provisions of said section. The burden of proof shall be upon any defendant in any such proceeding to rebut said presumption by a clear preponderance of the evidence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5496; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.

§ 77-5-513.
Private utilities are not liable for service during six and twelve month periods.

During the periods of six (6) and twelve (12) months, respectively, as provided in Sections 77-5-501 and 77-5-503, no person, firm, association or corporation within the area or areas indicated upon said maps within which the filing corporation proposes to operate shall have the right to require any electric utility or electric light and power company to supply electric energy. No action shall be brought or maintained in any court for damages for failure to supply such electric energy within said periods of six (6) and twelve (12) months, respectively, or within a reasonable time thereafter. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to apply to any valid and enforceable contracts in writing for electric service subsisting at the time of receipt by any party to such contracts of any notice of filing said maps and statements provided for in Section 77-5-501.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5497; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.

§ 77-5-515.
Inapplicability of article.

This article shall not apply to the furnishing of electric energy to manufacturing, processing or industrial enterprises or to buildings necessary and appropriate to the operation of said enterprises, including residences, or to the solicitation of such electric service, or to the construction of through high voltage transmission lines not intended to serve individual rural customers in the area or areas shown on said maps provided for in Section 77-5-501. However, nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting the right of the filing corporation to serve manufacturing, processing or industrial enterprises.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5498; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 77.